Idaho, session 2025, S1128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1760A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1760A. WATER MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT -- ANNUAL APPROPRIATION FOR WATER
INFRASTRUCTURE. (1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide for on-
going investment in water infrastructure, including assisting in the suc-
cess of the 2024 settlement agreement between surface water and groundwater
users on the eastern Snake plain. The legislature recognizes the vital role
of ongoing investments in water infrastructure in supporting the long-term
sustainability of Idaho's water resources and overall economy. This appro-
priation reflects the state's commitment to securing its economic success by
continuing a statewide approach to responsible water management and by main-
taining and securing the state's water supply for agricultural, municipal,
and industrial uses by Idaho citizens.
(2) The legislature hereby directs the addition of thirty million dol-
lars ($30,000,000), continuously funded out of the general fund, to the wa-
ter management account established in section 42-1760, Idaho Code, to be ad-
ministered by the Idaho water resource board. The funds shall be used for
planning, constructing, rehabilitating, reconstructing, and improving wa-
ter infrastructure throughout the state.
(3) Projects include but are not limited to:
(a) Aquifer recharge, ground water management, and other projects
aimed at sustaining aquifer health and long-term water availability;
(b) Development and rehabilitation of water storage and conveyance
systems, including reservoirs, diversion structures, pipelines, and
canals;
(c) Water supply and delivery improvements that enhance efficiency and
conservation; and
(d) Emergency water infrastructure repairs and upgrades to ensure the
resilience of vital water systems.
(4) No more than fifty percent (50%) of the funds appropriated in this
section may be used within a single board district, as defined in section
42-1732, Idaho Code, unless there are no competing funding applications
for water infrastructure projects in other districts for the current fiscal
year.


(5) The Idaho water resource board shall establish guidelines for the
application, evaluation, and allocation of funds to eligible projects in ac-
cordance with state water policy goals and statutory requirements.
(6) The board shall submit an annual report to the governor and the leg-
islature detailing the expenditures, progress, and effectiveness of funded
projects pursuant to this section.
(7) The board may coordinate with other state and federal agencies, as
well as local governments and private entities, to leverage additional fund-
ing and resources for water infrastructure development.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.